Montana, session 2025, HB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-13-2233, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-13-2233. Qualifications of directors. (1) To be eligible for election or appointment to a board of
directors, a person an individual must be:
(a) registered to vote as required by law;
(b) 18 years of age or older;
(c) a citizen of the United States; and
(d) a resident of the district or an owner of real property in the district who is a resident of the state
of Montana. An individual is an owner of real property in the district if the real property is titled in either an
individual name or held in a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or trust in which the individual is
an officer, partner, member, or trustee.
(2) A person An individual appointed to a board of directors as a nonvoting ex officio member as
provided in 7-13-2230 must meet the requirements of this section except that the person individual may reside
outside the boundaries of the district and is not required to own property in the district.
(3) A person An individual appointed by a municipality to a board of directors pursuant to 7-13-
2232(4) must have knowledge of the municipal water system."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 716
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 716
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 716
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 716, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 716
INTRODUCED BY A. GRIFFITH
AN ACT REVISING LAWS CONCERNING COUNTY WATER AND SEWER DISTRICTS; CLARIFYING THE
TYPE OF REAL PROPERTY OWNERSHIP THAT QUALIFIES AN INDIVIDUAL TO BE A MEMBER ON THE
BOARD OF DIRECTORS; AMENDING SECTION 7-13-2233, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”